Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
[OLD] PRISONS AND PRISONERS GENERALLY

§§353-1 to 353-50 [OLD] REPEALED. L
1987, c 338, §3(2).

Note

L 1987, c 127, §2 and c 142, pt of §1 purport to amend
repealed §§353-1.1, 353-1.2, 353-4, and 353-30.

PART I.
ADMINISTRATIVE STRUCTURE, INSTITUTIONS, AND SERVICES

Law Journals and Reviews

The Hawaii Prison Inmate's Emerging Right to Due Process. 10
HBJ, no. 4, at 115 (1974).

§353-1 Definitions; director may delegate
powers. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committed person" means a person
committed to the custody of the director of public safety for imprisonment
pursuant to chapter 706, including a probationer serving a term of imprisonment
pursuant to section 706-624(2)(a) and a misdemeanant or petty misdemeanant
sentenced pursuant to section 706-663.

"Department" means the department of
public safety.

"Director" means the director of
public safety; provided that the signing or approval of vouchers and other
routine matters may be delegated by the director to any authorized subordinate.
[L 1987, c 338, pt of §3; am L 1989, c 211, §8; am L 1993, c 72, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next